Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
UNACCOMPANIED HOMELESS YOUTH GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section, “unaccompanied  homeless youth” means a person who is at
least 14 years of age but not more than 24 years of age, who is not in the  physical custody of a
parent or legal guardian and who is homeless.
(2) In addition  to any other scholarships or grants, the Department of Human Services may
award two-year grants to organizations that provide services to unaccompanied homeless youth.
[(3) An organization is eligible  to apply for a grant under this section if the organization has an
existing grant with the department to provide services to unaccompanied homeless youth. ]
(3) The department may award a grant under this section to an organization that:
(a) Has an existing grant from the department to provide services to  unaccompanied
homeless youth;
(b) Has an existing contract with the  department to provide services to unaccompanied
homeless youth and the department has determined that the organization is capable  of ex-
panding to provide services in additional communities;
(c) Is a nonprofit organization or a coalition of nonprofit organizations that the  depart-
ment has determined is capable of meeting the grant program requirements; or
(d) Is a new entity that the  department determines is capable of meeting the grant pro-
gram requirements.
(4) Grants awarded under this section may be used for any of the following:
(a) To increase the accessibility  of any of the following programs and services to unaccompanied
homeless youth:
(A) Shelter facilities;
(B) Outreach;
(C) Culturally specific services; and
(D) Mental health or substance abuse services; and
(b) To create or strengthen partnerships  with host home programs and other transitional hous-
ing options.
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-A) Page 1
(5) The department may adopt rules to administer the grant program described in this section.
TUITION AND FEE WAIVERS
SECTION 2.  ORS 350.300 is amended to read:
350.300. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 341.290, 352.105  or 353.050, a student who is a  current foster
child or former foster child  or a current homeless youth  or former homeless youth,  under 25
years of age [ who is ] and enrolled in courses totaling one or more credit hours at an  institution of
higher education as an undergraduate student shall  have the amount of tuition and all fees levied
against the  student waived if attending an institution of higher education for purposes of pursuing
an initial undergraduate degree.
(2) A student [ who is a current foster child or former  foster child ] is entitled to waiver of tuition
and all fees under subsection (1) of this section until the student has received the equivalent of four
years of undergraduate education.
(3) As a condition of receiving a tuition waiver for an  academic year, [ a current foster child or
former foster child ] the student  must complete and submit the Free Application for Federal Student
Aid (FAFSA)  for that academic year.
(4) A  waiver of tuition and all fees under subsection (1) of this section may be reduced by the
amount of any federal aid scholarships or grants, an award from the Oregon  Opportunity Grant
program established under ORS 348.205 and any other aid  received from the institution of higher
education. For the purposes  of this subsection, “federal aid scholarships or grants” does not include
Chafee [ Education] Educational and  Training [ Grant vouchers (P.L. 107-133) ] Voucher Program
grants under 42 U.S.C. 677.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Former foster child” means  an individual who, for a total of six or more months while be-
tween 14 and 21 years of age, was:
(A) A ward of the court pursuant to ORS 419B.100 (1)(b) to (e), in  the legal custody of the De-
partment of Human Services for out-of-home placement  and not dismissed from care before reaching
16 years of age; or
(B) An Indian child subject to ORS 419B.600 to 419B.654, under the jurisdiction of a tribal  court
for out-of-home placement and not dismissed from care before reaching 16 years of age.
(b) “Homeless youth” means a person who:
(A) Experienced homelessness  for a total of six or more months while between 14 and
24 years of age;
(B) While experiencing homelessness  as described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph,
received services from an organization contracted  by the Department of Human Services to
provide services to homeless persons or from a host home, as defined by  the department by
rule; and
(C) Was at least 16 years of age when the  person last received the services described in
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
[(b)] (c)  “Institution of higher education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(B) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341; or
(C) The Oregon Health and Science University.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS  350.300 by section 2 of this 2022 Act first apply to
tuition and fee waivers granted for the 2022-2023 academic year.
INDEPENDENT RESIDENCE FACILITIES
SECTION 4.  ORS 418.475 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-A) Page 2
418.475. (1) Within the limit of  moneys appropriated therefor, the Department of Human Services
may establish,  license, certify or authorize independent residence facilities for unmarried persons
who:
(a)(A) Are at least 16 years of age and not older than 20 years of age;
[(b)] (B)  Have been placed in at least one substitute care resource;
[(c)] (C) Have been determined by the  department to possess the skills and level of responsibility
required for the transition to adulthood;
[(d)] (D)  Have received permission from the appropriate juvenile court, if they  are wards of the
court;  and
[(e)] (E)  Have been determined by the department to be  suitable for an independent living
program[.]; or
(b)(A) Are at least 16 years of age and not older than 24 years of age;
(B) At any time after attaining  14 years of age experienced homelessness for an aggre-
gate of six months;
(C) While experiencing homelessness as described in  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,
received services from an organization contracted by the department to provide services to
homeless persons or from a host home, as defined by the department by rule; and
(D) Last received the services described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph  after at-
taining 16 years of age.
(2) Independent  residence facilities shall provide independent housing arrangements with coun-
seling services and minimal supervision available from at least one counselor.
(3) Each  resident shall be required to maintain a department approved independent living plan
consisting  of  education, employment or volunteer activities, or a combination thereof, and shall be
required to pay a portion or all of the resident’s housing expenses  and other support costs. The
department may approve an exception to the requirements of this subsection for reasons of tempo-
rary loss of employment or of other financial support.
(4) The department may make payment grants directly to persons enrolled in an independent
living program who, at a minimum, meet the requirements described in subsection  [ (1)(a) to (c) ]
(1)(a)(A) to (C) or (b)  of  this section for food, shelter, clothing, transportation and incidental ex-
penses. The payment  grants shall be subject to an agreement between the person and the depart-
ment that establishes a budget of expenses.
(5) The department may establish cooperative financial  management agreements with a person
enrolled in an independent  living program and for that purpose may enter into joint bank accounts
requiring two signatures for withdrawals. The management agreements or joint  accounts may not
subject  the  department or any counselor involved to any liability for debts or other responsibilities
of the [ minor] person.
(6) The department shall make  periodic reports to the juvenile court as required by the court
regarding any ward of the court who is enrolled in an independent living program.
(7) The enrollment of a person in an independent  living program in accordance with the pro-
visions of subsection (1) of this section or making payment grants under subsection (4) of this sec-
tion does not remove or limit in any  way the obligation of the parent of the person to pay support
as ordered by a court under the provisions of ORS 419B.400.
REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY
SECTION 5.
In its 2022 report to the interim legislative committees required  under ORS
417.799, the Department  of Human Services shall include recommendations for legislation to
reduce the numbers of youth experiencing  homelessness by at least 25 percent over a five-
year period. The  department shall develop the recommendations under this section in con-
sultation with the Housing  and Community Services Department. The recommendations
must include descriptions of  new programs to address youth homelessness or options for
extending access to existing adult programs to youth, together with estimates  of additional
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-A) Page 3
funding necessary to implement or extend the proposed programs. The  report must also in-
clude a projected 20-year estimate of cost savings to state and  local health, education, cor-
rections and public safety programs if the 25 percent reduction in youth homelessness  over
five years is achieved.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 6. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $437,500 for the purpose of awarding grants under sec-
tion 1, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021, to organizations described in section 1  (3)(b), (c) or
(d), chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021, that will  provide services in communities where services
for unaccompanied homeless youth are severely constrained or absent.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Department of Human Services, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $35,000 for the purpose of providing grants to  programs that will assist
homeless youth in accessing the tuition and  fee waiver program under ORS 350.300 or the
homeless youth independent residence facility program under ORS 418.475.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Department of Human Services, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $750,000 for the purpose of implementing the provisions  relating to the
homeless youth independent residence facilities program under ORS 418.475.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 7.
Section 5 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 8. The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2022 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-A) Page 4
Passed by House February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4013 (HB 4013-A) Page 5